Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7350 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma State Department of Health shall promulgate rules
for the establishment of a COVID-19 Blood Bank. The COVID-19 Blood
Bank shall only receive and store unvaccinated blood untainted from
the COVID-19 shots.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-13956 TJ 12/22/25


Req. No. 13956 Page 1